Wisconsin, session 2025, AB97.
do enact as follows:AB97,11Section 1. 49.46 (1) (a) 1m. of the statutes is amended to read:AB97,2,6249.46 (1) (a) 1m. Any pregnant woman whose income does not exceed the 3standard of need under s. 49.19 (11) and whose pregnancy is medically verified. 4Eligibility continues to the last day of the month in which the 60th day or, if 5approved by the federal government, the 90th 365th day after the last day of the 6pregnancy falls.AB97,27Section 2. 49.46 (1) (j) of the statutes is amended to read:AB97,2,12849.46 (1) (j) An individual determined to be eligible for benefits under par. (a) 99. remains eligible for benefits under par. (a) 9. for the balance of the pregnancy and 10to the last day of the month in which the 60th day or, if approved by the federal 11government, the 90th 365th day after the last day of the pregnancy falls without 12regard to any change in the individual’s family income.AB97,313Section 3. 49.47 (4) (ag) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB97,2,171449.47 (4) (ag) 2. Pregnant and the woman’s pregnancy is medically verified. 15Eligibility continues to the last day of the month in which the 60th day or, if 16approved by the federal government, the 90th 365th day after the last day of the 17pregnancy falls.AB97,418Section 4. 49.471 (6) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB97,3,41949.471 (6) (b) A pregnant woman who is determined to be eligible for benefits 1under sub. (4) remains eligible for benefits under sub. (4) for the balance of the 2pregnancy and to the last day of the month in which the 60th day or, if approved by 3the federal government, the 90th 365th day after the last day of the pregnancy falls 4without regard to any change in the woman’s family income.AB97,55Section 5. 49.471 (7) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB97,3,17649.471 (7) (b) 1. A pregnant woman whose family income exceeds 300 percent 7of the poverty line may become eligible for coverage under this section if the 8difference between the pregnant woman’s family income and the applicable income 9limit under sub. (4) (a) is obligated or expended for any member of the pregnant 10woman’s family for medical care or any other type of remedial care recognized under 11state law or for personal health insurance premiums or for both. Eligibility 12obtained under this subdivision continues without regard to any change in family 13income for the balance of the pregnancy and to the last day of the month in which 14the 60th day or, if approved by the federal government, the 90th 365th day after the 15last day of the woman’s pregnancy falls. Eligibility obtained by a pregnant woman 16under this subdivision extends to all pregnant women in the pregnant woman’s 17family.AB97,3,1818